West Virginia, session 2026, HB5347.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. FIRE FIGHTING; FIRE COMPANIES AND DEPARTMENTS; CIVIL SERVICE FOR PAID FIRE DEPARTMENTS §8-15-8a. Eligibility for allocation from municipal pensions and protection fund and the Fire Protection Fund. §8-15-8a. Eligibility for allocation from municipal pensions and protection fund and the Fire Protection Fund. (a) In order to be eligible to receive revenues allocated from the municipal pensions and protection fund or the Fire Protection Fund, each volunteer or part volunteer fire company or department must meet the following requirements:(1) Submit and maintain current submission of fire loss data to the State Fire Marshal;(2) Complete or be in the process of receiving firefighters training, including section one of the West Virginia University fire service extension or its equivalent. The fire company or department must have at least ten members certified as having completed the training or if a volunteer fire company or department has twenty or fewer members, fifty percent of the active volunteer members must have completed such training; and(3) Comply with all applicable federal and state laws, including, but not limited to, the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) standards, Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) regulations, and West Virginia Code Chapter 29A regarding state administrative procedures; and (4) Shall be a member of the West Virginia State Firemen’s Association with the following conditions:(a) A current membership without outstanding dues exceeding 90 days, and(b) Not under any active suspension or expulsion by the Association.(b)(c) Each volunteer or part volunteer fire company or department shall have a grace period of ninety days, beyond the allocation date in which to comply with submission requirements to the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal shall notify each volunteer or part volunteer fire company or department of the due date for submitting the information required by this section and the grace period by certified mailing requiring signature and a return receipt.(c)(d) When the records or property of a volunteer or part volunteer fire company or department are destroyed by a fire or other natural disaster, then the affected volunteer or part volunteer fire company or department is exempt from the provisions of subdivision (1) and (4), within subsection (a) of this section, for the three months 90-day period immediately following the destruction of the records.